Illinois, session 104th, SB2594.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 1  5    Section 5. The sum of $4,127,800, or so much thereof as may 6be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 7the Illinois Community College Board for operational expenses 8for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 9    Section 10. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 10be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 11the Illinois Community College Board for administrative and 12programmatic costs associated with public community colleges 13for participation in the Common App System, including prior 14years' costs. 15    Section 15. The sum of $1,365,300, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to Illinois Community College Board for costs associated 18with administering high school equivalency tests. 19    Section 20. The sum of $4,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   SB2594- 2 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for grants to the 2alternative schools network and other providers. 3    Section 25. The sum of $60,200, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Illinois Community College Board for awarding scholarships 6to qualifying graduates of the Lincoln's Challenge Program. 7    Section 30. The sum of $15,657,900, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for the City 10Colleges of Chicago for educational-related expenses. 11    Section 35. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 13from the General Revenue Fund to the Illinois Community 14College Board for distribution to qualifying public community 15colleges for the purposes specified:16  Small College Grants................................548,40017  Performance Funding Grants..........................359,00018    Total                                            $907,400 19    Section 40. The sum of $666,100, or so much thereof as may 20be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 21the Illinois Community College Board for costs associated with 22the development, support or administration of the Illinois   SB2594- 3 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1Longitudinal Data System. 2    Section 45. The sum of $1,447,900, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Illinois Community College Board to operate an 5educational facility in the former community college district 6#541 in East St. Louis. 7    Section 50. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for costs 10associated with transitional and developmental instruction. 11    Section 55. The sum of $28,794,400, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for all costs 14associated with the bridge and workforce programs. 15    Section 60. The sum of $5,900,000, or so much thereof as 16may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 17Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for Southwestern 18Illinois College to operate an educational facility in the 19former Lindenwood University campus in Belleville. 20    Section 65. The sum of $5,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue   SB2594- 4 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for costs 2associated with trade schools. 3    Section 70. The sum of $18,975,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 5Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for all costs 6associated with career and technical education activities. 7    Section 75. The sum of $23,791,800, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for payment of 10costs associated with education and educational-related 11services for adult education and literacy activities. 12    Section 80. The sum of $11,798,500, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for payment of 15costs associated with education and educational-related 16services to local eligible providers for performance-based 17awards. 18    Section 85. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 20Illinois Community College Board for distribution to 21qualifying public community colleges for the purposes 22specified:  SB2594- 5 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1From the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund:2  Base Operating Grants...........................105,570,0003From the Education Assistance Fund:4  Base Operating Grants...........................106,822,2005  Equalization Grants..............................84,045,5006    Total                                        $296,437,700 7    Section 90. The sum of $4,264,400, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois Community College Board to reimburse 10colleges for costs associated with the Illinois Veterans Grant 11and Illinois National Guard Grant. 12    Section 95. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for the Pipeline 15for Advancement of the Healthcare (PATH) Workforce Program. 16    Section 100. The sum of $6,000,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for the 19administration and distribution of grants for the 20implementation of the Mental Health Early Action on Campus 21Act. 22    Section 105. The sum of $9,000,000, or so much thereof as   SB2594- 6 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for costs 3associated with advanced manufacturing and electric vehicle 4technologies programs. 5    Section 110. The sum of $2,000,000, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for costs 8associated with digital instruction for Title II adult 9education. 10    Section 115. The sum of $750,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 12the Illinois Community College Board for costs associated with 13the expansion of English-language services. 14    Section 120. The sum of $3,175,000, or so much thereof as 15may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 16Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for grants and 17administrative costs associated with dual credit grants. 18    Section 125. The sum of $5,175,000, or so much thereof as 19may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 20Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for grants and 21administrative costs associated with non-credit workforce 22programs.   SB2594- 7 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1    Section 130. The sum of $250,000, or so much thereof as may 2be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 3the Illinois Community College Board for grants and 4administrative costs associated with the community college 5Homelessness Prevention Grant program. 6    Section 135. The sum of $500,000, or so much thereof as may 7be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 8the Illinois Community College Board for operational expenses 9associated with grant management. 10    Section 140. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the ICCB Research and 12Technology Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for 13costs associated with maintaining and updating instructional 14technology. 15    Section 145. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the High School Equivalency 17Testing Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for costs 18associated with administering high school equivalency tests. 19    Section 150. The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Illinois Community 21College Board Contracts and Grants Fund to the Illinois   SB2594- 8 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1Community College Board to be expended under the terms and 2conditions associated with the moneys being received, 3including prior years' costs. 4    Section 155. The sum of $625,000, or so much thereof as may 5be necessary, is appropriated from the ICCB Federal Trust Fund 6to the Illinois Community College Board for the ordinary and 7contingent expenses of the Board. 8    Section 160. The sum of $1,600,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the ICCB Adult 10Education Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for 11operational expenses associated with administration of adult 12education and literacy activities. 13    Section 165. The sum of $27,400,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the ICCB Adult 15Education Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for 16payment of costs associated with education and 17educational-related services to local eligible providers and 18to Support Leadership Activities, as Defined by U.S.D.O.E. for 19adult education and literacy as provided by the United States 20Department of Education. 21    Section 170. The sum of $22,000,000, or so much thereof as 22may be necessary, is appropriated from the Career and   SB2594- 9 -OMB104 00142 LAP 10142 b1Technical Education Fund to the Illinois Community College 2Board for all costs associated with career and technical 3education activities. 4    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 52025.